Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.050

General laws relating to corporations for profit applicable.

The provisions of Title 23B RCW and all powers and rights thereunder, apply to associations, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 72 s 45; 1959 c 312 s 5.]